Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1975 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Human Services shall update and
maintain its Provider Search website that locates agencies that
provide services for the following Home and Community Based
programs:
1. Advantage Waiver;
Req. No. 16155 Page 1

2. Living Choice;
3. Medically Fragile Waiver; and
4. State Plan Personal Care (SPPC).
B. The website shall also include:
1. A rating system established by the Department or another
accredited licensing agency;
2. Inspection reports;
3. Substantiated complaints;
4. Administrator information; and
5. A link to the State Department of Health to be able to
report an issue with an agency.
C. The Department shall require agencies to update information
on the website annually.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16155 TJ 02/05/26








Req. No. 16155 Page 2